Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.31.020

Liberal construction.

With respect to the content of such claims the provisions of RCW 4.96.020 shall be liberally construed so that substantial compliance will be deemed satisfactory.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.31.020.]